Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF145.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1063YH (8) 91 as/js H.F. 145 Section 1. Section 709.15, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0b. âCharter schoolâ means a school 3 established under chapter 256E or 256F. 4 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0f. âNonpublic schoolâ means any school, 5 other than a public school, that is accredited pursuant to 6 section 256.11. 7 Sec. 2. Section 709.15, subsection 1, paragraph g, 8 subparagraph (1), subparagraph divisions (c), (d), and (e), 9 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 10 (c) A person employed by a school district , charter school, 11 or nonpublic school full-time, part-time, or as a substitute. 12 (d) A person who performs services as a volunteer for a 13 school district , charter school, or nonpublic school and who 14 has direct supervisory authority over the student with whom 15 the person engages in conduct prohibited under subsection 3 , 16 paragraph âaâ . 17 (e) A person who provides services under a contract for such 18 services to a school district , charter school, or nonpublic 19 school and who has direct supervisory authority over the 20 student with whom the person engages in conduct prohibited 21 under subsection 3 , paragraph âaâ . 22